Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6113YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2172 Section 1. Section 257.11B, subsection 11, paragraph a, 1 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Each pupil participating in the education savings account 3 program is required to take all one of the following sets of 4 student assessments: 5 (1) All applicable state and federally required student 6 assessments and the . 7 (2) Standardized, nationally norm-referenced student 8 assessments in mathematics and English language arts in the 9 same grades as comparable tests are administered under the 10 federal Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95. 11 b. The results of those the assessments shall be provided to 12 the pupilâs parents or guardians and reported to the department 13 of education. 14